Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
INDUSTRIAL PARKS

§171-131 Definitions. For the purposes
of this part:

"Eligible lessee" means a person who
is:

(1) Engaged or proposing to engage in an industrial
use; and

(2) Qualified to lease public lands under this
chapter.

"Industrial park" means an area of
public lands which is designated an industrial park in accordance with this
part.

"Industrial use" means the
manufacturing, refining, sorting, processing, storing, maintaining, or
repairing of materials, substances, products, or equipment.

"Infrastructure" includes water,
drainage, sewer, waste disposal, and waste treatment systems, roads, and street
lighting. [L 1988, c 361, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 173, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next